Illinois, session 104th, SB1572.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 10-9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)7    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 8and related offenses.9    (a) Definitions. In this Section:10    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 1112-6.12    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 13account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 14received by any person. 15    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 16organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 17venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 18limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 19company, or other entity or business association, including 20all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 21parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 22associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 23    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings   SB1572- 2 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 2that violate the Frauds Act.3    (4) (Blank).4    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.5    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 6secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 7initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 8type of service.9    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 10secure performance thereof.11    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 12nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 13reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 14surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 15the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 16or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 17incurring that harm. 18    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 19relationship between a person and the actor in which the 20person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 21benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 22sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 23are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 24may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.25    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 26recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public   SB1572- 3 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 2appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.3    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 4practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).5    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 6servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 7subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 8to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the 9following means, or any combination of these means: 10        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 11    person;12        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 13    restrain another person;14        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 15    process;16        (4) knowingly destroys, conceals, removes, 17    confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported passport 18    or other immigration document, or any other actual or 19    purported government identification document, of another 20    person;21        (5) uses intimidation, or exerts financial control 22    over any person; or23        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 24    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 25    perform the labor or services, that person or another 26    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint.   SB1572- 4 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 2or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony 3for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 4imprisonment of not less than 9 years and not exceeding 45 5years, (b)(2) is a Class X 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 1 2 6felony, (b)(4) is a Class 2 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a 7Class 3 4 felony. 8    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 9commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 10knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 11obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 12provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years 13of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 14sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 15production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 16minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:17        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 18    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;19        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 20    under the age of 17 years; or21        (3) there is overt force or threat.22    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 23or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class X 1 felony, 24(c)(2) is a Class X felony for which the person shall be 25sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 9 years 26and not exceeding 45 years, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony for   SB1572- 5 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1which the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 2of not less than 9 years and not exceeding 45 years. 3    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 4in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 5harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 6attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 7obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that 8the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 9benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from 10participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 11involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 12minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 13company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving 14anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 15engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 16sexual servitude of a minor.17    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 18or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class X 191 felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 20business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be 21imposed.22    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 23involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 24criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 25criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 26murder is a Class X felony for which the person shall be   SB1572- 6 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than 9 years 2and not exceeding 45 years. 3    (f) Sentencing considerations.4        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 5    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 6    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 7    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 8    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 9    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties 10    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 11    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which 12    the victim was held for more than one year.13        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 14    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 15    account the number of victims, and may provide for 16    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 17    than 10 victims.18    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 19Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 20the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 21the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 22labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 23guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 24of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 25whichever is greater.26    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under   SB1572- 7 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 2collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 3Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 45-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 5    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 6availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 7provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 8individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in 9this Section. 10    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 11Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 12writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 13federal agency, such as the United States Department of 14Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 15this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 16victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 17cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable 18the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 19an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 20federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 21be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 22are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 23available to the victim and his or her designated legal 24representative. 25    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 26involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in   SB1572- 8 -LRB104 05003 RLC 15031 b1persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 2subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 3Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 4(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 1-1-20.)